Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201354-1170
Director; transcripts; appeal; procedure.

The director shall keep a complete
transcript of all proceedings and evidence presented in any hearing under the Livestock Auction Market Act. The
applicant for a market license, any protestant formally appearing in the hearing for such
market license, the holder of any market license suspended or revoked, or
any party to a transfer application may appeal the order, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act.

Laws 1963, c. 319, § 14, p. 968;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 95;

Laws 2013, LB78, § 8.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.